Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 9 Probation Management

Editor’s notes.

The former article also pertained to probation management and was repealed on its own terms, effective June 30, 2008. The former article consisted of Code Sections

42-8-150

through 42-8-160 and was based on Code 1981, §§

42-8-150

through 42-8-160, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 775, § 7; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 42/HB 95; Ga. L. 2006, p. 425, § 2/HB 692.

42-8-150 through 42-8-159.
[Repealed]

History.

Code 1981, §§

42-8-150

through 42-8-159, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 32, § 1/SB 24; repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1/HB 310, effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 repeal of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 231 (2015).